Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.685, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01306 169.685 SEAT BELT; PASSENGER RESTRAINT SYSTEM FOR CHILDREN. Subd. 4. Admissibility into evidence. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), proof of the use or failure to use seat belts or a child passenger restraint system as described in subdivision 4a, or proof of the installation or failure of installation of seat belts or a child passenger restraint system as described in subdivision 4a is not admissible in evidence in any litigation involving personal injuries or property damage resulting from the use or operation of any motor vehicle. (b) Paragraph (a) does not affect the right of a person to bring an action for damages arising out of an incident that involves a defectively designed, manufactured, installed, or operating seat belt or child passenger restraint system. Paragraph (a) does not prohibit the introduction of evidence pertaining to the use of a seat belt or child passenger restraint system in an action described in this paragraph.